tr: Vücut/yüz kıl tipi: Kalın; İnce; Diğer
de: Körper-/Gesichtshaartyp: Grob; Fein; Sonstiges
ru: Тип волос на теле или лице: Грубые; Тонкие; Другое
lt-LT: Kūno / veido plaukų tipas: Šiurkštūs; Ploni; Kita
hu: Test-/Arcszőrzet típusa: Erős; Gyenge; Egyéb
ko: 체모 유형: 거친; 파인; 기타
fi: Ihokarvatyyppi: Karkeat; Ohut; Muu
cs: Typ chloupků na těle a obličeji: Hrubé; Jemný; Jiné
el: Τύπος τρίχας σώματος/προσώπου: Τραχιές; Λεπτές; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta dlak na telesu/obrazu: Grobo; Fino; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de pelo corporal/facial: Áspero; Fina; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de păr corporal/facial: Aspru; Subțire; Altele
th: ประเภทขนตามร่างกาย/ใบหน้า: ผมหยาบ; บาง; อื่นๆ
en: Body/Facial hair type: Coarse; Fine; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de pelo facial/corporal: Espesso; Ralo; Outro
hr-HR: Tip dlačica na tijelu/licu: Čvrsta; Tanka; Ostalo
it: Tipo di peli del corpo/viso: Grossi; Fine; Altro
da: Krops-/ansigtshårtype: Groft; Fin; Andet
bg-BG: Тип окосмяване по тялото/лицето: Груб; Фин; Други
sv: Typ av kropps-/ansiktshår: Tjockt; Fint; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ ochlpenia na tele/tvári: Hrubý; Jemný; Iné
zh-TW: 體毛/汗毛類型: 濃密; 細; 其他
fr: Type de poils du corps/du visage: Épais; Fin; Autre
vi: Kem làm nhạt màu lông mặt và thân: Tóc thô; Mảnh; Khác
nl: Type lichaams- en gezichtshaar: Grof; Fijn; Andere
pl: Rodzaj zarostu na ciele/twarzy: Filtr zgrubny; Dobre; Inne
ja: 顔の毛/体毛のタイプ: 硬毛; ファイン; その他
zh-CN: 身体/面部毛发类型: 粗发丝; 细; 其他
nb: Hårtype for kropps- og ansiktshår: Grovt; Tynn; Annet
es: Tipo de vello corporal/facial: Grueso; Fino; Otros